Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-6605
Program certification application; consideration; limitations.

The director shall consider program certification applications under section 77-6604 in the order in which they are received. The director may accept program certification applications on a continuous basis or may establish, by rule and regulation, an annual program certification application deadline. The director may approve program certification applications for eligible businesses for a total of up to three million dollars in tax credits for calendar years 2022 and 2023 and up to six million dollars in tax credits for calendar years 2024 and 2025. The director shall not approve any program certification applications for eligible businesses for calendar years 2026 through 2029. For calendar year 2030 and each calendar year thereafter, the director may approve program certification applications for eligible businesses for a total of up to six million dollars in tax credits per calendar year. Program certification applications approved after such annual limit has been reached shall be placed on a wait list in the order in which they are received.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 71;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 53.